Utah statutes.
11-36-402.   Challenging an impact fee by arbitration  -- Procedure --
Appeal -- Costs.
(1)  Each person or entity intending to challenge an impact fee under
Subsection 11-36-401(4)(c)(ii) shall file a written request for arbitration
with the local political subdivision within the time limitation provided in
Subsection 11-36-401(4)(b) for the applicable type of challenge.
(2)  If a person or entity files a written request for arbitration under
Subsection (1), an arbitrator or arbitration panel shall be selected as
follows:
(a)  the local political subdivision and the person or entity filing the
request may agree on a single arbitrator within ten days after the day the
request for arbitration is filed; or
(b)  if a single arbitrator is not agreed to in accordance with Subsection
(2)(a), an arbitration panel shall be created with the following members:
(i)  each party shall select an arbitrator within 20 days after the date the
request is filed; and
(ii)  the arbitrators selected under Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall select a third
arbitrator.
(3)  The arbitration panel shall hold a hearing on the challenge within 30
days after the date:
(a)  the single arbitrator is agreed on under Subsection (2)(a); or
(b)  the two arbitrators are selected under Subsection (2)(b)(i).
(4)  The arbitrator or arbitration panel shall issue a decision in writing
within ten days from the date the hearing under Subsection (3) is completed.
(5)  Except as provided in this section, each arbitration shall be governed by
Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform Arbitration Act.
(6)  The parties may agree to:
(a)  binding arbitration;
(b)  formal, nonbinding arbitration; or
(c)  informal, nonbinding arbitration.
(7)  If the parties agree in writing to binding arbitration:
(a)  the arbitration shall be binding;
(b)  the decision of the arbitration panel shall be final;
(c)  neither party may appeal the decision of the arbitration panel; and
(d)  notwithstanding Subsection (10), the person or entity challenging the
impact fee may not also challenge the impact fee under Subsection
11-36-401(1), (4)(c)(i), or (4)(c)(iii).
(8) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (8)(b), if the parties agree to
formal, nonbinding arbitration, the arbitration shall be governed by the
provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(b)  For purposes of applying Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act, to a formal, nonbinding arbitration under this section, notwithstanding
Section 63G-4-502, "agency" means a local political subdivision.
(9) (a)  An appeal from a decision in an informal, nonbinding arbitration may
be filed with the district court in which the local political subdivision is
located.
(b)  Each appeal under Subsection (9)(a) shall be filed within 30 days after
the date the arbitration panel issues a decision under Subsection (4).
(c)  The district court shall consider de novo each appeal filed under this
Subsection (9).
(d)  Notwithstanding Subsection (10), a person or entity that files an appeal
under this Subsection (9) may not also challenge the impact fee under
Subsection 11-36-401(1), (4)(c)(i), or (4)(c)(iii).
(10) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (7)(d) and (9)(d), this section
may not be construed to prohibit a person or entity from challenging an impact
fee as provided in Subsection 11-36-401(1), (4)(c)(i), or (4)(c)(iii).
(b)  The filing of a written request for arbitration within the required time
in accordance with Subsection (1) tolls all time limitations under Section
11-36-401 until the date the arbitration panel issues a decision.
(11)  The person or entity filing a request for arbitration and the local
political subdivision shall equally share all costs of an arbitration
proceeding under this section.
